Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.88.030

Costs of election.

The state of Washington shall assume the costs of any special election called under RCW 29A.88.020 in the same manner as provided in RCW 29A.04.420 and 29A.04.430.

[ 2003 c 111 s 2203. Prior: 1986 ex.s. c 1 s 5. Formerly RCW 29.91.030.]